Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.152

Solid waste collection—Rate increase notice.

(1) A city that contracts for the collection of solid waste, or provides for the collection of solid waste directly, shall notify the public of each proposed rate increase for a solid waste handling service. The notice may be mailed to each affected ratepayer or published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the collection area. The notice shall be available to affected ratepayers at least forty-five days prior to the proposed effective date of the rate increase.

(2) For purposes of this section, "solid waste handling" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70A.205.015.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1016; 1994 c 161 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—1994 c 161: See note following RCW 35.21.157.